Louisiana, session 2026, HB612.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1452(C)(7) and 1454(B)(3) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§1452. Purpose of rate regulation; construction; definitions
* * *
C. As used in this Subpart, the following definitions apply:
* * *
(7) "Expenses" means that portion of a rate attributable to acquisition, field
supervision, collection expenses, general expenses, taxes, licenses, and fees and does
not include loss adjustment expenses or institutional advertising expenses.
* * *
§1454. Rating standards and methods
* * *
B. In determining whether rates are excessive, inadequate, or unfairly
discriminatory, consideration may be given to the following items:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1046 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 612
(3) Expenses. The expense provisions shall reflect the operating methods
of the insurer, the past expense experience of the insurer, and anticipated future
expenses. However, an insurer shall not consider its institutional advertising
expenses for the purpose of setting rates.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 22:1452(C)(9.1) is hereby repealed in its entirety.